dictsource/mto_rules
// Translation rules for mto
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.L01 a e i o u ä ë ï ö ü
.L02 m n

.group a
	a			a

.group ä
	ä			A

.group e
	e			e

.group ë
	ë			@

.group i
	i			i

.group ï
	ï			8

.group o
	o			o

.group ö
	ö			oU

.group u
	u			u

.group v
	v(_			f
	_)v(o		b
	j)v			vj
	v(j			vj
	v			v

.group s
	s			s

.group x
	L01)x		z.
	L02)x		z.
	j)x			s.j
	x(j			s.j	
	x 			s.

.group j
	j			h

.group ts
	%L01)ts		dz
	L02)ts		dz
	j)ts		tsj
	ts(j		tsj
	ts			ts

.group p
	L01)p(L01	b
	L02)p(L01	b
	p(_			p#
	j)p			pj
	p(j			pj
	p			p

.group t
	L01)t(L01	d
	L02)t(L01	d
	j)t			tj
	t(j			tj
	t(_			t#
	t			t

.group k
	L01)k(L01	g
	L02)k(L01	g
	k(_			k#
	j)k			kj
	k(j			kj
	k			k

.group ꞌ
	ꞌ			?

.group m
	j)m			mj
	m(j			mj
	m			m

.group n
	n(p			m
	n(k			N
	j)n			nj
	n(j			nj
	n			n

.group r
	r	r

.group l
	l	l

.group y
	y	j
